Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202633-101
Secretary of State; fees.

There shall be paid to the Secretary of State the following fees:

(1) For requesting a certificate or exemplification with seal, a nonrefundable fee of ten dollars;

(2) For copies of records, for each page, a fee of one dollar;

(3) For accessing business entity records by electronic means:

(a) For batch requests of business entity information, fifteen dollars for up to one thousand business entities accessed and an additional fifteen dollars for each additional one thousand business entities accessed over one thousand;

(b) For an electronically transmitted certificate indicating whether a business is properly registered with the Secretary of State and authorized to do business in the state, six dollars and fifty cents;

(c) For the entire contents of the database regarding business entities, but excluding electronic images, three hundred dollars weekly subscription rate, one thousand dollars monthly subscription rate for a twice-monthly service, and eight hundred dollars monthly subscription rate;

(d) For images of business entity records accessed over the Internet, forty-five cents for each page or image of a page; and

(e) For the entire contents of the image database regarding business entities, eight hundred dollars monthly subscription rate;

(4)(a) For bulk data requests of Uniform Commercial Code database information including records filed pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code, Chapter 52, article 2, 5, 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, or 14, Chapter 54, article 2, the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act, or the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, a nonrefundable fee of:

(i) Eight hundred dollars for an initial file;

(ii) Eight hundred dollars for a monthly update file; and

(iii) Three hundred dollars for a weekly update file.

(b) Effective financing statement data accessed through bulk data requests shall be for informational purposes only and shall not provide the protection afforded a buyer registered pursuant to section 52-1312;

(5) For images of Uniform Commercial Code database information records accessed over the Internet, forty-five cents for each page or image of a page;

(6) For filings by for-profit corporations and associations required or permitted by law to file articles of incorporation or organization with the Secretary of State, the fees provided in section 21-205 unless otherwise specifically provided by law; and

(7) For filings by nonprofit corporations and associations required or permitted by law to file articles of incorporation or organization with the Secretary of State or for such a filing by any entity declared to be a corporation under section 21-608, the fees provided in section 21-1905 unless otherwise specifically provided by law.

The Secretary of State shall remit all fees collected pursuant to subdivisions (1), (2), and (4) through (7) of this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund. The Secretary of State shall remit all fees collected pursuant to subdivision (3) of this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Records Management Cash Fund, and such fees shall be distributed as provided in any agreements between the State Records Board and the Secretary of State.

Laws 1877, § 5, p. 196;

Laws 1897, c. 72, § 1, p. 331;

Laws 1907, c. 139, § 1, p. 445;

Laws 1911, c. 128, § 1, p. 435;

R.S.1913, § 2423;

Laws 1921, c. 104, § 1, p. 374;

C.S.1922, § 2364;

C.S.1929, § 33-103;

R.S.1943, § 33-101;

Laws 1947, c. 118, § 1, p. 349;

Laws 1955, c. 63, § 12, p. 207;

Laws 1961, c. 156, § 1, p. 477;

Laws 1965, c. 183, § 1, p. 569;

Laws 1969, c. 268, § 1, p. 1030;

Laws 1975, LB 95, § 6;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 27;

Laws 1994, LB 1004, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 214;

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 194;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 18;

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 23;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB278, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 279;

Laws 2018, LB749, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB835, § 1.
July 18, 2026
Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act, see section 52-1007.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.

Building and loan associations are not exempted from paying the fee required by this section for filing certificates of increase of capital stock. State ex rel. Equitable Building Loan & Savings Assn. v. Amsberry, 104 Neb. 843, 178 N.W. 828 (1920).

Under the 1897 amendment to this section, a building and loan association was not required to file its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State and pay him a fee as a condition precedent to obtaining a certificate of approval. State ex rel. Bullard v. Searle, 86 Neb. 259, 125 N.W. 590 (1910).

This section is cited in a footnote to the opinion to the effect that most state statutes measure domestic incorporation fees according to the amount or number of shares of capital stock authorized. Atlantic Refining Co. v. Virginia, 302 U.S. 22 (1837).